Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 71.
PERSONAL PROPERTY TAXES.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by S.J.R. 8 during the 1991 Regular Session and adopted at the 1992 general election by a vote of 578,609 for and 235,932 against.

§ 1. Exemption from ad valorem taxes.

Items of household furniture and furnishings, clothing, appliances, and other personal property used within the home, if not held for sale, rental, or other commercial or professional use, shall be exempt from all ad valorem taxes levied by any city, county, school district, or other taxing unit in this state.

§ 2. Motor vehicles — Procedures for assessment and collection.

In addition to the method established by law for assessing and collecting real and personal property taxes, the General Assembly may establish special procedures, in lieu thereof, for the assessment and collection of annual personal property taxes on motor vehicles, owned by individuals, at the time of issuance or renewal of the registration and the license thereof. Personal property taxes collected on motor vehicles under such procedures shall be based on the assessed value of the vehicles determined at the time the tax is paid, computed at the rate of personal property taxes levied during the preceding November, in the manner provided by law, in the taxing units in which the owner of the motor vehicle resides, or in which the motor vehicle is regularly located and assessed, and the taxpayer shall not be required to pay ad valorem taxes upon such motor vehicle based on the assessment for the previous year. In no event may more than one year's personal property taxes be collected on the same vehicle in the same year. Personal property taxes collected on motor vehicles under such procedures shall be remitted to the counties in which due, for distribution, as revenues of the year in which collected, to the respective taxing units in the manner provided by law.

§ 3. Supersession of Article 16, Section 5.

The provisions of this amendment shall be in lieu of those provisions of Article 16, Section 5 of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas relating to the assessment and taxation of tangible personal property.

§ 4. Effective date.

This amendment shall be in effect from and after January 1, 1993.